Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 13

Tourist Oriented Directional Signs

54-5-1301. Establishment of program — Contracts.

The department of transportation is authorized to conduct a tourist oriented directional signs program, referred to as TODS, within the right-of-way of state highways by either the entry into administrative service and construction contracts or by the administration of the program with department personnel, at the option of the department.

Contracts for administrative and construction services shall be subject to former §§ 12-4-109 — 12-4-111 [See the Compiler’s Notes]. Contracts for administrative or construction services shall include provisions requiring appropriate corporate surety performance bond, security or cash. Contracts for the services shall be awarded based on an objective, competitive bid basis to the lowest responsible bidder.

Should the commissioner determine that it is in the best interest of the state for the department to conduct the program set forth in this part through the award of an administrative service or construction contract or contracts, the scope of the services provided by the contracts shall be at the discretion of the commissioner.

TODS shall be available to lawful cultural, historical, recreational, agricultural, educational, or entertaining activities, state and national parks, and commercial activities that are unique and local in nature, and the major portion of whose income or visitors are derived during its normal business season from motorists not residing in the immediate area of the activity.

Notwithstanding this chapter or any other law to the contrary, the department shall have sole and exclusive jurisdiction over the design, erection, installation, and maintenance of tourist oriented directional signs (“TODS signs”) located within the right-of-way of any highway designated as part of the state highway system, including TODS signs within the corporate limits of municipalities.

As used in this part, “tourist oriented directional signs” or “TODS signs” refer only to the specific category of guide signs authorized in the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices for use on rural conventional roads to display business identification and directional information for eligible tourist-oriented facilities. TODS signs do not include specific service signs as authorized in part 11 of this chapter, community wayfinding signs, or other types of guide signs authorized in the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices.

Acts 1993, ch. 505, § 2; 1995, ch. 518, § 2; 2016, ch. 892, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 12-4-109 – 12-4-111, referred to in this section, were recodified by Acts 2013, ch, 403, effective July 1, 2013. Provisions similar to former § 12-4-109 were transferred to other sections within title 12, ch. 3, parts 1, 3, and 5. Provisions similar to former §§ 12-4-110 and 12-4-111 were transferred to §§ 12-3-303 and 12-3-302, respectively.

Acts 1996, ch. 1000, § 2 provided for the repeal of Acts 1995, ch. 518, § 6 concerning the inapplicability of that act to any scenic highway compiled in title 54, chapter 17, part 1.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added (c) and (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 892, § 5. April 27, 2016.

Cross-References. Specific service signs, title 54, ch. 5, part 11.

Collateral References. Highways
153 et seq.

54-5-1302. Compliance with other requirements.

In all respects, the erection of TODS shall comply with:

The Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices;

Local zoning and local zoning authorities; and

All laws and regulations for scenic highways, in accordance with chapter 17, part 1 of this title, and scenic parkways, chapter 17, part 2 of this title.

Any TODS sign that was, or is, erected or installed within the right-of-way of any state highway by any local government or any entity other than the department or a contractor acting for the department is hereby declared illegal, and the sign shall be removed by the local government or entity that erected or installed it; provided, however, that the cost of removal may be recovered from the facility or facilities advertised on the sign. If the local government or entity fails or refuses to remove the sign within one hundred eighty (180) days after ordered by the department, the department shall remove the sign and may recover the cost of removal from the local government that constructed the sign. This subsection (b) shall not apply to any TODS sign erected or installed prior to April 27, 2016, within any county having a population of not less than eighty-nine thousand eight hundred (89,800) nor more than eighty-nine thousand nine hundred (89,900), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1993, ch. 505, § 4; T.C.A., § 54-5-1303; Acts 1995, ch. 518, § 3; 2016, ch. 892, § 2; 2017, ch. 23, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added (b).

The 2017 amendment substituted “within any county having” for “within the corporate limits of the county seat of any county having” in the last sentence of (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 892, § 5. April 27, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 23, § 2. March 29, 2017.

54-5-1303. Rules and regulations.

The department of transportation shall promulgate necessary rules to accomplish the effect and intent of this part. The rules shall define eligible users of TODS; establish an application process for obtaining a TODS sign; provide for the department to charge fees to cover the cost of signing and administration of the TODS program; and address other topics suggested in the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices.

Acts 1993, ch. 505, § 3; T.C.A. § 54-5-1302; Acts 1995, ch. 518, § 4; 2016, ch. 892, § 3.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the first sentence; and rewrote the second sentence which read: “The regulations shall define eligible users of TODS; provide for the department to charge fees to cover the cost of signing; and address other topics suggested in the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 892, § 5. April 27, 2016.

54-5-1304. Competitive bidding.

With respect to a TODS sign, the department shall not enter into a contract for the procurement of signs or other goods or for contracts for services unless the contract is objectively and competitively bid, pursuant to former § 12-3-102(a)(8). The department shall not use the request for proposals (RFP) procedure in the contracting process. The signs shall be subject to the requirements of part 11 of this chapter.

Acts 1995, ch. 518, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 12-4-109(a)(2), formerly referred to in this section, was transferred to § 12-3-102(a)(8), by Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 9, effective July 1, 2013.

Former § 54-5-1304 (Acts 1993, ch. 505, § 5), concerning scenic highways, was repealed by Acts 1995, ch. 518, which repealed this part and reenacted it without including that section. Acts 1995, ch. 518 took effect January 1, 1996, except for the promulgation of rules and regulations, for which purposes it took effect June 12, 1995.

54-5-1305. Maintenance of inventory of signs.

The department of transportation shall develop and maintain an inventory of TODS signs located within state highway rights-of-way, including signs erected by the department or any other person or entity, and indicating whether the signs are located within, or outside, the corporate limits of a municipality. The initial inventory shall be completed by no later than July 1, 2018.

Acts 2016, ch. 892, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 54-5-1305 (Acts 1993, ch. 505, § 6), concerning the conclusion of the pilot program and reports, was repealed by Acts 1995, ch. 518, which repealed this part and reenacted it without including that section. Acts 1995, ch. 518 was effective January 1, 1996, except for the purpose of promulgation of rules and regulations, for which purpose it took effect June 12, 1995.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 892, § 5. April 27, 2016.

54-5-1306. Competing applications for inclusion — Selection criteria — Renewal.

Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, when there are two (2) or more competing applications for inclusion on a particular TODS sign assembly the department shall award installation on the TODS sign assembly to the business from which the department first received a qualified application for the installation.

If the department receives on the same day two (2) or more competing applications for a particular TODS sign, assembly and the competing applications qualify for participation in the TODS program, the department shall award installation on the TODS sign assembly to the business with the greatest eligibility distance.

Once the TODS sign of a business has been installed on a particular TODS sign assembly, the business shall have the right to renew the TODS sign, notwithstanding the application and qualification of a business with a greater eligibility distance. This subsection (c) shall not apply if the business fails to comply with all applicable rules and regulations or fails to pay any applicable fees.

No business shall be eligible to have a TODS sign on a particular TODS sign assembly if the business is greater than ten (10) miles from the TODS sign assembly. The mileage from the TODS sign to the business shall be placed on the TODS sign, unless two (2) or more businesses that offer similar activities, features or opportunities have a single sign on the TODS sign assembly.

Acts 1997, ch. 156, § 1.